Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3909
Judicial district public defender; established.

There is hereby established the office of judicial district public defender subject to the provisions of sections 29-3910 to 29-3918.

Laws 1969, c. 234, § 1, p. 863;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1805.01;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 27.